Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-710.06
Sickness and accident insurance; standard policy form; provisions; order of arrangement.

The provisions which are the subject of sections 44-710.03 and 44-710.04 or any corresponding provisions which are used in lieu thereof in accordance with such sections shall be printed in the consecutive order of the provisions in such sections, or at the option of the insurer, any such provision may appear as a unit in any part of the policy of sickness and accident insurance with other provisions to which it may be logically related if the resulting policy is not in whole or in part unintelligible, uncertain, ambiguous, abstruse, or likely to mislead a person to whom the policy is offered, delivered, or issued.

Laws 1957, c. 188, § 7, p. 656;

Laws 1989, LB 92, § 136.